Utah statutes.
68-3-11.   Rules of construction as to words and phrases.
Words and phrases are to be construed according to the context and the
approved usage of the language; but technical words and phrases, and such
others as have acquired a peculiar and appropriate meaning in law, or are
defined by statute, are to be construed according to such peculiar and
appropriate meaning or definition.
